South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4459.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 53-3-230 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 53-3-230.  The second Saturday of November of each year is designated as "Penn Center Heritage Day" in South Carolina to promote and preserve Penn Center's true history and culture through its commitment to education, community development, and social justice. On the second Saturday of November each year, there must be a parade honoring Penn Center Heritage Day. The route for the parade must be determined by the local governing body. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----